Georgia statutes. TITLE 22 Eminent Domain
Article 2 Proceeding Before Special Master

Cross references.

Succession by auditors to duties previously performed by masters in superior courts of state, §

9-7-1

.

Law reviews.

For article, “Condemning Local Government Condemnation,” see 39 Mercer L. Rev. 11 (1987).

22-2-100.
“Condemning body” and “condemnor” defined.

As used in this article, “condemning body” or “condemnor” means:

The State of Georgia or any branch or any department, board, commission, agency, or authority of the executive branch of the government of the State of Georgia;

Any county or municipality of the State of Georgia;

Any housing authority with approval of the governing authority of the city or county as provided in Code Section 8-3-31.1;

Any other political subdivision of the State of Georgia which possesses the power of eminent domain; and

All public utilities that possess the right or power of eminent domain.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 461, § 1; Ga. L. 1967, p. 825, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 7/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015).

22-2-101.
Effect of article on other methods of condemnation; intent of article.

This article shall be supplementary to and cumulative of the methods of condemnation described in Articles 1 and 3 of this chapter in cases in which the state, or any branch of the government of the state, or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision of the state, or any housing authority, or any other person possessing the power of eminent domain is concerned. This article is intended to provide a simpler and more effective method of condemnation in those cases where a judicial supervision of the proceedings is desirable by reason of the necessity for a quick determination of the just and adequate compensation to be paid the owner of the property or interest subject to be condemned, or by reason of the number of parties at interest or the conflicting interests of such parties, or in cases where there are parties who are non compos mentis or who are not sui juris or who are nonresidents, or in cases where there are conflicting interests or doubtful questions. In all particulars not otherwise specially provided for in this article, the court shall conform its procedure as nearly as possible to Articles 1 and 3 of this chapter.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 2.

22-2-102.
Requirements for condemnation; time of hearing; directions for notice and service; attachment of process to petition; cause to proceed in rem.

In addition to the requirements set forth in Chapter 1 of this title, whenever it is desirable, for any reason, to arrive at a quick and certain determination of the compensation to be paid first to the condemnee for the taking or damaging of private property, the condemnor shall:

File a petition in a superior court having jurisdiction for a judgment in rem against the property or interest therein, as provided in Code Section 22-2-130; and

At or before the filing of the petition, present a copy of the petition to a judge of the superior court of the county wherein the property or interest sought to be condemned is located. Thereupon, unless waived by the parties the judge shall have a hearing in court, in chambers, or by telephone with the parties not less than ten days nor more than 30 days from the filing of the petition to appoint a special master. After such hearing, the judge shall make an order requiring the condemnor, the person in possession of the property or interest, and each person with a legal claim or interest to appear at a hearing before a special master at a time and place specified in the order and to make known their rights, if any, in and to the property or interest sought to be condemned, their claims as to the value of the property or interest, and any other matters material to their respective rights.

The hearing before the special master shall take place not less than 30 days nor more than 60 days after the date of the entry of the order appointing the special master.

The order shall give such directions for notice and the service thereof as are appropriate and as are consistent with this article, in such manner as to provide most effectively an opportunity to all parties at interest to be heard. In condemnations for purposes of constructing or expanding one or more electric transmission lines, in addition to service of the order, a copy of the order shall be mailed by certified mail or sent by statutory overnight delivery to any person shown by the public ad valorem tax records of the county in which the property is located to have an interest in the property and to any other person having open and obvious possession of the property. It shall not be necessary to attach any other process to the petition except the order so made, and the cause shall proceed as in rem.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 5; Ga. L. 2004, p. 568, § 1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 8/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 568, § 3, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section: “shall apply to the exercise of eminent domain to acquire easements or other property interests for which land acquisition negotiations for purposes of constructing or expanding one or more electric transmission lines begin on or after such date. The provisions of this Act relating to additional compensation, reconveyance, and quitclaim shall apply to easements and other property interests acquired on or after July 1, 2004, through the exercise of eminent domain.”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2004 amendment of this Code section, see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 157 (2004).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 427 (2009).

22-2-102.1.
Petitioning superior court for judgment in rem.

In addition to the requirements set forth in Code Section 22-1-10, whenever it shall be necessary for such condemning body to take or damage private property, or any interest or easement therein, in pursuance of any law so authorizing, for any public use, and where, by reason of the necessities of the public needs, of which the condemning body shall be the exclusive judge, and it shall be desirable for these reasons to have a quick and effective adjudication of the just and adequate compensation to be paid the owner or owners of such property before taking the same, and it shall be desirable to have a judicial ascertainment and judicial supervision of all questions and proceedings connected with the matter, such condemning body may, through any authorized representative, petition the superior court of the county having jurisdiction, for a judgment in rem against said property, or any easement or other interest in said property, condemning the same in fee simple to the use of the petitioner upon payment of just and adequate compensation therefor.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 3; Code 1981, §

22-2-102.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 16.1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 9/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

The provisions of this Code section were previously enacted in substantially similar form by Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 3. However, those provisions were not enacted as part of the original Code by the Code enactment Act (Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8).

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For note, “Standards of Judicial Review of Condemnation Proceedings Under Georgia’s Special Master’s Act,” see 20 Ga. St. B.J. 82 (1983).

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007).

22-2-102.2.
Contents of petition.

The petition referred to in Code Section 22-2-102.1 shall set forth:

The facts showing the right to condemn;

The property or interest to be taken or damaged;

The names and residences of the persons whose property or interests are to be taken or otherwise affected, so far as known;

A description of any unknown persons or classes of unknown persons whose rights in the property or interest are to be affected;

A statement setting forth the necessity to condemn the private property and describing the public use for which the condemnor seeks the property; and

Such other facts as are necessary for a full understanding of the cause.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 4; Code 1981, §

22-2-102.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 16.1; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 10/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

The provisions of this Code section were previously enacted in substantially similar form by Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 4. However, those provisions were not enacted as part of the original Code by the Code enactment Act (Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8).

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For survey article on real property law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2007).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007).

22-2-103.
Appointment of special master generally.

The special master provided for in this article shall be appointed by the judge or judges of the superior courts of each judicial circuit and shall discharge the duties provided for in this article. Nothing contained in this article shall be construed as limiting the number of special masters for the circuit, and any judge of the superior court may appoint a special master for any particular case or cases. The special master so appointed must be a competent attorney at law, be of good standing in his profession, and have at least three years’ experience in the practice of law. His relation and accountability to the court shall be that of an auditor or master in the general practice existing in this state. He shall hold office at the pleasure of the judge and shall be removable at any time with or without cause. Each special master shall take and file in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property or interest to be condemned is situated, along with the order of his appointment, an oath or affidavit substantially in the form prescribed in Code Section 22-2-105.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 682, § 1.

Cross references.

Auditors generally, T. 9, C. 7.

Law reviews.

For article, “The New Special Master Rule — Uniform Superior Court Rule 46: Life Jackets for the Courts in the Perfect Storm,”
see 15 (No. 4) Ga. St. B.J. 20 (2009).

22-2-104.
Appointment of special master form to be used in appointing special master.

Substantially, the following form should be used in appointing a special master:

, a competent attorney at law, residing in the Judicial Circuit, and of at least three years’ experience in the practice of law, is hereby appointed a special master in and for the Judicial Circuit, to discharge the duties of special master as provided in the condemnation law of this state. This appointment is (either for general duties or for a particular case, as the case may be). This day of , . Judge, Superior Court

Click to view

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 7; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 22.

22-2-105.
Oath of special master.

The special master is required to take the following oath to be filed along with the order of his appointment in the office of the clerk of the superior court of the county in which the property or interest to be condemned is situated:

I, , do swear that I will faithfully, well, and truly perform the duties of special master under the condemnation law, according to law and to the best of my skill and ability. Sworn to and subscribed before me this day of , . (Title and authority of attesting officer)

Click to view

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 682, § 2; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 22.

22-2-106.
Compensation of special master; allowance by judge of reasonable time for special master to inspect premises.

The compensation of the special master shall be provided for by a proper order of the judge of the superior court; shall be included in and made a part of the judgment of the court condemning the property or any interest therein sought to be taken, such judgment to be based on the award of the special master and shall be paid by the condemning body. Such compensation shall be left to the discretion of the court and shall not exceed a reasonable hourly rate consistent with local standards unless otherwise agreed upon by the parties with consent of the court. The compensation of the special master shall be assessed as court costs and shall be paid prior to the filing of any appeal from the judgment of the court; provided, however, that if such compensation has not been determined and assessed at the time of filing any such appeal, the same shall be paid within 30 days from the date of assessment.

The judge may allow the special master a reasonable period of time for personal inspection of the premises and may compensate the special master for his or her time spent inspecting the premises and for any actual expenses incurred by the special master in connection with the inspection, provided that the special master shall file an affidavit with the court showing his or her time spent in inspection and itemizing his or her expenses.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 9; Ga. L. 1975, p. 27, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 408, § 2; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 11/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall only apply to petitions for condemnation filed on or after April 4, 2006.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

22-2-107.
Service of process; award by special master and judgment of court conclusive as to right of condemnor to take or damage property or interest.

Copies of the petition, together with the order of the court provided for in Code Section 22-2-102, shall in all cases be served upon the person in possession of the property or interest sought to be condemned and upon all persons who are known to have any rights in such property or interest.

The return of service signed by the sheriff or his lawful deputy, or an affidavit of service executed by any citizen of this state, reciting that a copy of the petition and order was served upon the named condemnee in person or by leaving a copy at the place of his residence, shall be sufficient evidence as to the service of the named condemnee. It shall be the duty of the sheriff or citizen, as the case may be, to cause service to be made within three days from the date of the order of the judge on the petition.

If any of the condemnees or other persons known to have any rights in the property or interest reside outside of the county, the judge shall order service to be made upon such party or parties. Such service shall be perfected by causing a copy of the petition and order to be served upon the party or parties by the sheriff or any lawful deputy of the county of the residence of the party or parties. In addition, service may be made by any citizen. The return of such sheriff or lawful deputy, or the affidavit of such citizen that the party or parties were served, either in person or by leaving a copy of the petition and order at the residence, shall be conclusive as to service.

The sheriff or any lawful deputy of the county where the petition is filed shall serve nonresidents of this state:

By posting a copy of the petition, together with the order of the judge thereon, on the bulletin board at the courthouse door of the county in which the property or interest sought to be condemned is located for not less than five days prior to the time of the hearing before the special master;

By the insertion of a notice identifying the property or interest sought to be condemned, as well as the date and place of the hearing before the special master, in a newspaper having general circulation in the county wherein such property or interest is located, for one issue of said paper, the date of which shall be not less than four nor more than seven days prior to the hearing before the special master, and which is the same newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements are carried; and

Where the address of such nonresidents is known, by mailing to them by registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery a copy of the petition and order.

If any of the persons entitled to service under this Code section are minors, or insane persons, or persons otherwise laboring under disabilities, the guardian of such persons shall be served. If the guardian resides outside of the county or is a nonresident, he or she shall be served as provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section. If such minor or other person laboring under disabilities has no guardian, service shall be perfected by serving the disabled person personally or, in the event the disabled person lives outside of the county or is a nonresident, by serving the disabled person by the method provided in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section for other persons who live outside of the county or are nonresidents, and by serving the judge of the probate court of the county wherein such property or interest is located, who shall stand in the place of and protect the rights of the disabled person or appoint a guardian ad litem for such person.

In the event of unknown persons or unborn remaindermen who are likely to have any rights in the property or interest or the proceeds thereof, the judge of the probate court of the county wherein such property or interest is located shall be served with a copy of the petition and order; and it shall be his duty to stand in the place and protect the rights of such unknown parties or unborn remaindermen.

The purpose of this article being to quicken and simplify the condemnation proceeding in all cases where the public good requires it and to provide for a condemnation in rem against the property or interest required to be taken or damaged and insofar as is reasonably possible to protect the rights of all parties to be heard at the time of the hearing before the special master, a substantial and reasonable effort to comply with the various modes of service provided for in this Code section shall be sufficient. Insofar as concerns the right of the condemning body to take or damage the property or any interest therein, upon the payment of the amount awarded by the special master into the registry of the court, the award of the special master and the judgment of the court condemning the property or interest to the use of the condemning body shall be conclusive.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 10; Ga. L. 1966, p. 388, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 4.3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2004, p. 161, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2005, and all appointments of guardians of the person or property made pursuant to former Title 29 shall continue in effect and shall thereafter be governed by the provisions of this Act.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey on zoning and land use law, see 61 Mercer L. Rev. 427 (2009).

22-2-108.
Powers and duties of special master generally.

The special master appointed pursuant to Code Section 22-2-103 shall serve in lieu of a board of assessors; provided, however, that if two assessors are selected pursuant to Code Section 22-2-108.1, the special master shall serve as the chairperson of the special master panel and shall decide all issues other than value issues which arise at the hearing provided for in Code Section 22-2-102. The special master’s duties and authority, except as otherwise provided for in this article, shall be the same as provided by Code Sections 22-2-61 through 22-2-63. The special master shall hold the hearing provided for in Code Section 22-2-102 at the time and place provided by the order of the judge of the superior court and in compliance with the duties and authority conferred by this article. The special master shall not be authorized to continue or delay the hearing, except as otherwise provided by Code Section 22-2-108.1, relating to granting of a recess for selection of assessors, or by Code Section 9-10-150, relating to granting continuances by reason of membership in the General Assembly during sessions thereof, or except upon the written order of the judge of the superior court; and such a continuance shall be granted only for good cause shown to that judge. When it shall be necessary for the judge to grant a continuance, the continuance shall be for not more than five days from the date of the order granting the continuance.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 11; Ga. L. 1973, p. 479, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 3.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

22-2-108.1.
Special master panel; selection; notice; powers and duties.

At any time at least five calendar days before commencement of the hearing specified in the order of the judge of the superior court, the condemnee or any other person having a right or interest in the property may, by written notice served on the condemnor and all other parties to the proceeding, select an assessor to hear and decide value issues at the hearing. Within five days after receipt of such notice, the condemnor shall, by written notice served on the condemnee and all other parties to the proceeding, select an assessor to hear and decide value issues at the hearing. The provisions of Code Sections 22-2-40 and 22-2-41 shall apply to the selection of such assessors; provided, however, that the special master appointed pursuant to Code Section 22-2-103 shall serve as the third assessor, shall be compensated as provided for in Code Section 22-2-106, and shall continue to perform the duties set forth in Code Section 22-2-108. Notwithstanding the number of condemnees or any other persons having a right or interest in the property, only one assessor shall be selected on behalf of all such condemnees or interested parties.

In the event that the notice selecting an assessor by the condemnee or other person having a right or interest in the property is not served on the condemnor more than five days before the time on which the hearing is to commence as specified in the order of the judge of the superior court, the special master shall convene the hearing at the time and place specified in the order; and if requested by the condemnor, the special master shall then recess the hearing to a date certain, but not more than five calendar days after such time, to allow the condemnor additional time to select an assessor.

After the condemnee or other person having a right or interest in the property has selected an assessor and the condemnor has selected an assessor, the special master and the two assessors selected by the parties shall constitute the special master panel and, except as otherwise provided in this article, shall perform the duties provided by Code Sections 22-2-61 through 22-2-63. A majority of the special master panel shall decide all value issues which arise at the hearing provided for in Code Section 22-2-102 and shall prepare and submit the award as provided in Code Section 22-2-110.

History.

Code 1981, §

22-2-108.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 3.

Law reviews.

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

22-2-109.
Factors to be considered in determining or estimating just and adequate compensation; determination of date of taking; inclusion of date of approval of original location of highway in petition for condemnation; newspaper advertisement.

In determining or estimating just and adequate compensation to be paid to the owner of any property or interest condemned for public road and street purposes, neither the special master nor the special master panel, in the event such a panel exists, nor the jury, in the event of an appeal to a jury, shall be restricted to the agricultural or productive qualities of the land; but inquiry shall be made as to all other legitimate purposes to which the land could be appropriated. The date of taking as contemplated in this Code section shall be the date of the filing of the condemnation proceedings for the acquisition of the property or interest.

The condemning authority shall cause the petition for condemnation to set forth the date of the approval of the original location of the highway. It shall be the further duty of the condemning authority, within 30 days from the date of the original approval and designation of said location as a highway, to cause the location of said highway in said county to be advertised once each week for four consecutive weeks in the newspaper of the county in which the sheriff’s advertisements are carried; and said advertisement shall designate the land lots or land districts of said county through which such highway will be located. Said advertisement shall further show the date of the said original location of such highway as hereinbefore provided for in this subsection. Said advertisement shall further state that a plat or map of the project showing the exact date of original location is on file at the office of the Department of Transportation, and that any interested party may obtain a copy of same by writing to the Department of Transportation (One Georgia Center, 600 West Peachtree NW, Atlanta, Georgia 30308) and paying a nominal cost therefor.

In determining just and adequate compensation for property or interests taken or condemned for public road and street purposes, the award of the special master or the special master panel, in the event such a panel exists, or the verdict of the jury, in the event of an appeal, shall, in addition to fixing the value of the land actually taken and used for such purposes, take into consideration the prospective and consequential damages to the remaining property or interest from which the property or interest actually taken was cut off, which consequential damages result to such remaining property or interest because of the location of such public road or street upon the portion actually taken. In addition, the increase of the value of such remaining property or interest from the location of such public road or street shall be considered. Such consequential benefits, if any, may be offset against such consequential damages, if any; but in no event shall consequential benefits be offset against the value of the property or interest taken for such public improvement.

History.

Ga. L. 1966, p. 320, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 4; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 22/HB 142.

Cross references.

Provisions regarding condemnation of property for public road purposes, §

32-3-4

et seq.

Law reviews.

For comment on State Hwy. Dep’t v. Lumpkin,

222 Ga. 727

,

152 S.E.2d 557

(1966), see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 483 (1967).

For review of 1998 legislation relating to eminent domain, see 15 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 115 (1998).

For survey article on real property law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 371 (2007).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007).

22-2-110.
Award of special master and special master panel; time of filing; award to become part of record of proceedings; vesting of title in condemnor upon deposit of award into court; form of award; use in subsequent appeal.

The award of the special master or the special master panel, in the event such a panel exists, shall be served in a manner consistent with Code Section 9-11-5 upon all the parties and filed with the clerk of the superior court of the county where the property or interest is situated within three days after the date on which such hearing is completed. The special master or the special master panel shall mail the award to the condemnor and any condemnees on the date of filing of the award and provide a certificate of service evidencing the mailing of such award.

The award shall become a part of the record of the proceedings in said matter and shall condemn and vest title to the property or other interest in the condemning body upon the deposit by that body of the amount of the award into the registry of the court, subject to the demand of such condemnee or condemnees, according to their respective interests.

The award shall be in the following form:

Click to view

In any case where there is an appeal from the award of the special master or the special master panel, in the event such a panel exists, to a jury in the superior court, such award shall not be competent evidence. Any such appeal shall be a de novo investigation, and such award shall be detached from the papers in the case before the same are delivered to the jury.

‘‘AWARD The special master appointed and chosen by the court to hear evidence and give full consideration to all matters touching upon the value of the property or interest sought to be condemned, as shown by the description of the property or interest in the case of (condemning body) versus (acres of land or other described interest in said land) and (condemnee), Civil action file no. in superior court, having first taken the oath as required by law of the special master, the same having been filed with the clerk of the Superior Court of County, and the special master panel, in the event such a panel exists, having heard evidence under oath and given consideration to the value of such property or interest on the day of , at : .M., as provided for in the order of the court, do decide and recommend to the court as follows: (1) I/We find and award to , condemnee, the sum of $, as the actual market value of the property or interest sought to be condemned; (2) I/We find consequential damages to the remaining property or interest in the amount of $; (3) I/We find consequential benefits to the remaining property or interest in the amount of $ (never to exceed the amount of the consequential damages); (4) I/We find and award to , condemnee, the sum of $, as the value of any associated moving costs; (5) Balancing the consequential benefits against the consequential damages, I/we find and award to the condemnee in this case in the total sum of $, and I/we respectfully recommend to the court that the said property or interest be condemned by a judgment in rem to the use of the condemnor upon the payment of the last stated sum into the registry of the court, subject to the demands of the condemnee. This day of , . Special Master Assessor Assessor’’

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 12; Ga. L. 1984, p. 682, § 3; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 5; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 12/HB 1313; Ga. L. 2016, p. 864, § 22/HB 737.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, in the undesignated language in the form in subsection (c), “evidence and” was substituted for “evidence,”, “and” was deleted following “in superior court,” and a comma was added following “Superior Court of
_______________
County”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

22-2-111.
Incorporation of award into judgment of court.

Upon the entry of the award of the special master or the special master panel, if such a panel exists, and the presentation of the award to the judge of the superior court, the judge shall enter a proper order and judgment of the court condemning the described property or other interest in rem to the use of the condemnor upon the condemnor’s paying into the registry of the court the amount provided in the award.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 13; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 6.

Law reviews.

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007).

For survey article on local government law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 147 (2015).

22-2-112.
Appeal of award generally; condemnee’s right to jury trial on issue of just and adequate compensation.

If the condemnor or any condemnee is dissatisfied with the amount of the award, an appeal shall be filed in the superior court and such appeal shall be filed within ten calendar days from the service of the award, plus three additional calendar days for mailing of the award. At the term succeeding the filing of the appeal, it shall be the duty of the judge to cause an issue to be made and tried by a jury as to the value of the property or interest taken or the amount of damage done, with the same right to move for a new trial and file an appeal as in other cases at law. The entering of an appeal and the proceedings thereon shall not hinder or delay in any way the condemnor’s work or the progress thereof.

The condemnee shall have the right to a jury trial on the issue of just and adequate compensation before the superior court having jurisdiction over the property sought to be condemned during the next term of court following the vesting of title in the condemnor. This right to a jury trial at the next term of court may be waived by the condemnee.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 14; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 7; Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 13/HB 1313.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 1/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as ‘The Landowner’s Bill of Rights and Private Property Protection Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2006, p. 39, § 25/HB 1313, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section shall apply to those condemnation proceedings filed on or after February 9, 2006, where title has not vested in the condemning authority unless constitutionally prohibited.

Law reviews.

For article on 2006 amendment of this Code section, see 23 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 157 (2006).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2008).

For survey article on real property law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 193 (2015).

22-2-113.
Prosecution of appeals; effect of discrepancy between award of special master and verdict of jury; issuance of execution upon award or judgment.

The tender, payment, or acceptance of the amount of the award shall not prevent any party from prosecuting the appeal.

Where separate and distinct parcels of property are condemned in the same proceeding, the owner of any separate and distinct property may file a separate appeal to a jury in the superior court.

If the amount awarded by the special master or the special master panel, if such a panel exists, is less than that found by the verdict of the jury, the condemnor shall be bound to pay the sum so finally adjudged less the amount previously deposited as provided in Code Section 22-2-110 plus lawful interest on the difference from the date of such deposit, in order to retain the property.

If the condemnor fails to pay the amount of the award or judgment within ten days after the same is filed or entered, then the clerk shall issue execution upon such award or judgment which may be levied upon any property of the condemnor.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 15; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 8.

Law reviews.

For article surveying developments in Georgia real property law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 219 (1981).

22-2-114.
Effect of deposit of award into court registry; conflicting claims as to deposit.

When the condemnor has paid into the registry of the court the amount provided for in the award of the special master or the special master panel, if such a panel exists, for the use and benefit of and subject to the demands of the condemnees, the effect of such payment into the registry of the court shall be the same as if paid to the condemnees directly, provided that the clerk shall pay out the money to the condemnees or their personal representatives upon proper proof submitted to him or her as to the quantity of their interests. Where there are conflicting claims, the clerk may require the conflicting parties to establish their claims before the court as is provided by law in other similar matters.

History.

Ga. L. 1957, p. 387, § 16; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1539, § 9.